fi: Erikoisvalmisteen tyyli: Barista; Tiivistetty; Erittäin kermainen; Runsasproteiininen; Lapsiystävällinen; Kevyt; Muu
da: Formulationsstil: Barista; Inddampet; Ekstra cremet; Højt proteinindhold; Børnevenlig; Light; Andet
zh-CN: 配方风格: 咖啡师款; 浓缩; 特别浓醇; 高蛋白; 儿童适用; 清淡; 其他
lt-LT: Formulės stilius: Barista; Sutirštintas; Itin kreminis; Daug baltymų; Tinka vaikams; Lengvas; Kita
nl: Formuleringsstijl: Barista; Geëvaporeerd; Extra romig; Eiwitrijk; Kindvriendelijk; Light; Overige
pt-PT: Estilo de formulação: Barista; Evaporado; Extra cremoso; Alto teor de proteína; Ideal para crianças; Ligeiro; Outro
it: Stile di formulazione: Barista; Evaporato; Extra cremoso; Ad alto contenuto proteico; Adatto ai bambini; Light; Altro
hr-HR: Stil formulacije: Barista; Kondenzirano; Iznimno kremasto; S visokim udjelom proteina; Prilagođeno djeci; Lagano; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на формулиране: Бариста; Изпарено; Екстра кремообразно; С високо съдържание на протеин; Подходящо за деца; Лайт; Друго
zh-TW: 配方樣式: 咖啡師; 蒸發; 特濃滑順; 高蛋白; 兒童適宜; 清淡; 其他
nb: Formuleringsstil: Barista; Evaporert; Ekstra kremet; Høyt proteininnhold; Barnevennlig; Lett; Annet
fr: Style de rédaction: Barista; Évaporé; Extra crémeux; Riche en protéines; Pour les enfants; Allégé; Autre
ja: 配合スタイル: バリスタ; 無糖練乳; エクストラクリーミー; 高タンパク質; キッズフレンドリー; ライト; その他
sv: Formuleringstyp: Barista; Evaporerad; Extra krämig; Hög proteinhalt; Barnvänlig; Lätt; Övrigt
ko: 제형 스타일: 바리스타; 에바포레이티드(증발형); 엑스트라 크리미; 고단백; 어린이용; 라이트; 기타
ru: Стиль рецептуры: Для бариста; Концентрированное; Экстра-сливочное; Высокобелковое; Для детей; Легкое; Другое
vi: Dạng bào chế: Barista; Đặc; Cực béo ngậy; Giàu protein; Phù hợp với trẻ em; Nhạt; Khác
cs: Styl formulace: Barista; Kondenzované; Extra krémové; Vysoký obsah bílkovin; Vhodné pro děti; Lehké; Jiné
es: Estilo de formulación: Barista; Evaporado; Extra cremoso; Alto en proteína; Apto para niños; Ligero; Otro
pl: Styl formuły: Barista; Odparowany; Bardzo kremowy; Wysokobiałkowy; Przyjazny dla dzieci; Lekki; Inny
pt-BR: Estilo de formulação: Barista; Evaporado; Extracremoso; Rico em proteínas; Adequado para crianças; Light; Outro
en: Formulation style: Barista; Evaporated; Extra creamy; High protein; Kid friendly; Light; Other
hu: Készítési forma: Barista; Sűrített; Extra krémes; Magas fehérjetartalmú; Gyermekbarát; Light; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štýl prípravku: Barista; Kondenzované; Extra krémové; S vysokým obsahom proteínov; Vhodné pre deti; Ľahké; Iné
el: Στυλ σύνθεσης: Barista; Εβαπορέ; Εξαιρετικά κρεμώδες; Υψηλής πρωτεΐνης; Φιλικό για παιδιά; Ελαφρύ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika formule: Barista; Kondenzirano; Zelo kremasto; Z visoko vsebnostjo beljakovin; Primerno za otroke; Lahko; Drugo
th: รูปแบบการคิดค้นสูตร: บาริสต้า; ระเหยน้ำ; ครีมมี่พิเศษ; โปรตีนสูง; เหมาะสำหรับเด็ก; ไลท์; อื่นๆ
tr: İçerik formu: Barista; Buharlaştırılmış; Ekstra kremsi; Yüksek proteinli; Çocuk dostu; Hafif; Diğer
de: Rezepturstil: Barista; Kondensiert; Extra cremig; Proteinreich; Kinderfreundlich; Leicht; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Stilul de formulare: Barista; Evaporat; Extra cremos; Bogat în proteine; Potrivit pentru copii; Light; Altele